Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2032
Osteopathic physician; license; additional requirements.

(1) If a person (a) has graduated from an accredited school or college of osteopathic medicine since January 1, 1963, (b) meets all statutory requirements for licensure as an osteopathic physician, (c) has served one year of internship or its equivalent at an institution approved for such training by the board, (d) after his or her internship, has taken and passed the examination provided in section 38-2026, and (e) presents proof satisfactory to the department, with the recommendation of the board, that he or she, within the three years immediately preceding the application for licensure, (i) has been in the active practice of the profession of osteopathic medicine and surgery in some other state, a territory, the District of Columbia, or Canada for a period of one year, (ii) has had one year of graduate medical education as described in subdivision (1)(c) of this section, (iii) has completed continuing education in medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery approved by the board, (iv) has completed a refresher course in medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery approved by the board, or (v) has completed the special purposes examination approved by the board, such person, upon making application therefor, shall receive a license as a Doctor of Osteopathic Medicine and Surgery which shall qualify such person to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery.

(2) With respect to persons who have graduated from an accredited school or college of osteopathic medicine prior to January 1, 1963, the department, with the recommendation of the board, may issue a license to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery to any such graduate who meets all the requirements for issuance of such license except graduation from an accredited school or college of osteopathic medicine after January 1, 1963.

Laws 1963, c. 408, § 1, p. 1310;

Laws 1969, c. 565, § 3, p. 2301;

Laws 1981, LB 451, § 11;

Laws 1989, LB 342, § 24;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 444;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 105;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 33;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,139.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 690.